Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1054
Tattooing, defined.

Tattooing means the process by which the skin is marked or colored by insertion of nontoxic dyes or pigments into or under the subcutaneous portion of the skin upon the body of a live human being so as to form indelible marks for decorative or figurative purposes.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 16;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-370.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 316.